Washington statutes.
RCW 36.67.510

Revenue bonds authorized.

The county legislative authority of any county is hereby authorized for the purpose of carrying out the lawful powers granted to the counties by the laws of the state to contract indebtedness and to issue revenue bonds evidencing such indebtedness in conformity with this chapter. Such bonds may be issued and sold in accordance with chapter 39.46 RCW.

[ 1983 c 167 s 79; 1965 c 142 s 1.]

NOTES:

Liberal construction—Severability—1983 c 167: See RCW 39.46.010 and note following.